Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 2
PLANNING COMMISSION

Law reviews:

For article, "Land Use Decisionmaking: Legislative or Quasi-judicial Action", see 18

C

olo. Law. 241 (1989).

31-23-201. Definitions.

As used in this part 2, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Mayor" means the chief executive of the municipality, whether the official designation of his office is mayor, city manager, or otherwise; except that with respect to municipalities operating under the statutory city manager form of government, the term means the city manager.

"Subdivision" means any parcel of land which is to be used for condominiums, apartments, or any other multiple-dwellings units, unless such land was previously subdivided and the filing accompanying such subdivision complied with municipal regulations applicable to subdivisions of substantially the same density, or the division of a lot, tract, or parcel of land into two or more lots, plats, sites, or other divisions of land for the purpose, whether immediate or future, of sale or of building development. It includes resubdivision and, when appropriate to the context, relates to the process of subdividing or to the land or territory subdivided.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1145, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

(2) amended, p. 1512, § 1, effective June 4.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-23-101 (3) and (6) as it existed prior to 1975.

31-23-202. Grant of power to municipality.

Any municipality is authorized to make, adopt, amend, extend, add to, or carry out a plan as provided in this part 2 and to create by ordinance or resolution a planning commission with the powers and duties set forth in this part 2.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1146, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-23-102 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-23-203. Personnel of the commission.

The municipal planning commission, referred to in this part 2 as the "commission", shall consist of not less than five nor more than seven members; except that a home rule city or town shall not be limited in the size of its commission. Unless otherwise provided by ordinance, the membership and terms of members shall be as follows:

When the commission is limited to five members, the membership shall consist of the mayor and a member of the governing body as ex officio members and three persons appointed by the mayor, if the mayor is an elective officer; otherwise by such office as the governing body may designate as the appointing power in the ordinance creating the commission.

When the commission consists of seven or more members, there shall be four ex officio members consisting of the mayor, one of the administrative officials selected by the mayor, a member of the governing body selected by the mayor, and a member of the governing body selected by the governing body; the balance of the membership shall be appointed as provided in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1).

All members of such commission shall be bona fide residents of the municipality and, if any member ceases to reside in such municipality, his membership on the commission shall automatically terminate.

All members of the commission shall serve without compensation unless otherwise provided by ordinance and the appointed members shall hold no other municipal office; except that one such appointed member may be a member of the zoning board of adjustment or appeals. The terms of ex officio members shall correspond to their respective official tenures; except that the term of the administrative official selected by the mayor shall terminate with the expiration of the term of the mayor who selected him or her. The term of each appointed member shall be six years or until his or her successor takes office; except that the respective terms of one-third of the members first appointed shall be two years, one-third shall be four years, and one-third shall be six years. Members other than the member representing the governing body may be removed, after public hearings, by the mayor for inefficiency, neglect of duty, or malfeasance in office, and the governing body may remove the member representing it for the same reasons. The mayor or the governing body, as the case may be, shall file a written statement of reasons for such removal. Vacancies occurring otherwise than through the expiration of term shall be filled for the remainder of the unexpired term by the mayor in the case of members selected or appointed by the mayor, by the governing body in the case of the member appointed by it, and by the appointing power designated by the governing body in municipalities in which the mayor is not an elective officer.

Notwithstanding any provisions of subsections (1) and (3) of this section to the contrary, the governing body of each municipality may provide by ordinance for the size, membership, designation of alternate membership, terms of members, removal of members pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, and filling of vacancies of the commission.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1146, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 79:

(4) added, p. 1188, § 1, effective June 19.

L. 2014:

(3) amended, (HB 14-1060), ch. 67, p. 292, § 1, effective August 6.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-23-103 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-23-204. Organization and rules.

The commission shall elect its chairman from among the non ex officio members and shall create and fill such other of its offices as it may determine. The term of the chairman shall be one year, with eligibility for reelection. The commission shall hold at least one regular meeting in each month. It shall adopt rules for transaction of business and shall keep a record of its resolutions, transactions, findings, and determinations, which record shall be a public record.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1147, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-23-104 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-23-205. Staff and finances.

The commission may appoint such employees as it deems necessary for its work; except that the appointment, promotion, demotion, and removal of such employees shall be subject to the same provisions of law as govern other corresponding civil employees of the municipality. The commission may also contract, with the approval of the governing body, with municipal planners, engineers, and architects and other consultants for such services as it requires. The expenditures of the commission, exclusive of gifts, shall be within the amounts appropriated for the purpose by the governing body, which shall provide the funds, equipment, and accommodations necessary for the commission's work.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1147, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-23-105 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-23-206. Master plan.

It is the duty of the commission to make and adopt a master plan for the physical development of the municipality, including any areas outside its boundaries, subject to the approval of the governmental body having jurisdiction thereof, that in the commission's judgment bear relation to the planning of the municipality. The master plan of a municipality is an advisory document to guide land development decisions; however, the plan or any part thereof may be made binding by inclusion in the municipality's adopted subdivision, zoning, platting, planned unit development, or other similar land development regulations after satisfying notice, due process, and hearing requirements for legislative or quasi-judicial processes as appropriate. When a commission decides to adopt a master plan, the commission shall conduct public hearings, after notice of such public hearings has been published in a newspaper of general circulation in the municipality in a manner sufficient to notify the public of the time, place, and nature of the public hearing, prior to final adoption of a master plan in order to encourage public participation in and awareness of the development of such plan and shall accept and consider oral and written public comments throughout the process of developing the plan. The plan, with the accompanying maps, plats, charts, and descriptive matter, must, after consideration of each of the following, where applicable or appropriate, show the commission's recommendations for the development of the municipality and outlying areas, including:

The general location, character, and extent of existing, proposed, or projected streets, roads, rights-of-way, bridges, waterways, waterfronts, parkways, highways, mass transit routes and corridors, and any transportation plan prepared by any metropolitan planning organization that covers all or a portion of the municipality and that the municipality has received notification of or, if the municipality is not located in an area covered by a metropolitan planning organization, any transportation plan prepared by the department of transportation that the municipality has received notification of and that covers all or a portion of the municipality;

The general location of public places or facilities, including public schools, culturally, historically, or archaeologically significant buildings, sites, and objects, playgrounds, squares, parks, airports, aviation fields, military installations, and other public ways, grounds, open spaces, trails, and designated federal, state, and local wildlife areas. For purposes of this section, "military installation" shall have the same meaning as specified in section 29-20-105.6 (2)(b), C.R.S.

The general location and extent of public utilities terminals, capital facilities, and transfer facilities, whether publicly or privately owned or operated, for water, light, sanitation, transportation, communication, power, and other purposes, and any proposed or projected needs for capital facilities and utilities, including the priorities, anticipated costs, and funding proposals for such facilities and utilities;

The general location and extent of an adequate and suitable supply of water.

If the master plan includes a water supply element, the planning commission shall consult with the entities that supply water for use within the municipality to ensure coordination on water supply and facility planning, and the water supply element must identify water supplies and facilities sufficient to meet the needs of the public and private infrastructure reasonably anticipated or identified in the planning process.

The water supply element must include water conservation policies, to be determined by the municipality, which may include goals specified in the state water plan adopted pursuant to section 37-60-106.3 and may include policies to implement water conservation and other state water plan goals as a condition of development approvals, including subdivisions, planned unit developments, special use permits, and zoning changes. A municipality with a master plan that includes a water supply element shall ensure that its master plan includes water conservation policies at the first amending of the master plan that occurs after September 14, 2020, but in no case later than July 1, 2025.

The department of local affairs created in section 24-1-125 may hire and employ one full-time employee to provide educational resources and assistance to municipalities that include water conservation policies in their master plans as described in subsection (1)(d)(III) of this section.

Nothing in this subsection (1)(d) shall be construed to supersede, abrogate, or otherwise impair the allocation of water pursuant to the state constitution or laws, the right to beneficially use water pursuant to decrees, contracts, or other water use agreements, or the operation, maintenance, repair, replacement, or use of any water facility.

The acceptance, removal, relocation, widening, narrowing, vacating, abandonment, modification, change of use, or extension of any of the public ways, rights-of-way, including the coordination of such rights-of-way with the rights-of-way of other municipalities, counties, or regions, grounds, open spaces, buildings, property, utility, or terminals, referred to in paragraphs (a) to (d) of this subsection (1);

A zoning plan for the control of the height, area, bulk, location, and use of buildings and premises. Such a zoning plan may protect and assure access to appropriate conditions for solar, wind, or other alternative energy sources, including geothermal energy used for water heating or space heating or cooling in a single building, for space heating for more than one building through a pipeline network, or for electricity generation; however, regulations and restrictions of the height, number of stories, size of buildings and other structures, and the height and location of trees and other vegetation shall not apply to existing buildings, structures, trees, or vegetation except for new growth on such vegetation.

The general character, location, and extent of community centers, housing developments, whether public or private, the existing, proposed, or projected location of residential neighborhoods and sufficient land for future housing development for the existing and projected economic and other needs of all current and anticipated residents of the municipality, and redevelopment areas. If a municipality has entered into a regional planning agreement, such agreement may be incorporated by reference into the master plan.

A master plan for the extraction of commercial mineral deposits pursuant to section 34-1-304, C.R.S.;

A plan for the location and placement of public utilities that facilitates the provision of such utilities to all existing, proposed, or projected developments in the municipality;

Projections of population growth and housing needs to accommodate the projected population for specified increments of time. The municipality may base these projections upon data from the department of local affairs and upon the municipality's local objectives.

The areas containing steep slopes, geological hazards, endangered or threatened species, wetlands, floodplains, floodways, and flood risk zones, highly erodible land or unstable soils, and wildfire hazards. For purposes of determining the location of such areas, the planning commission should consider the following sources for guidance:

The Colorado geological survey for defining and mapping geological hazards;

The United States fish and wildlife service of the United States department of the interior and the parks and wildlife commission created in section 33-9-101, C.R.S., for locating areas inhabited by endangered or threatened species;

The Unites States Army corps of engineers and the United States fish and wildlife service national wetlands inventory for defining and mapping wetlands;

The federal emergency management agency for defining and mapping floodplains, floodways, and flood risk zones;

The natural resources conservation service of the United States department of agriculture for defining and mapping unstable soils and highly erodible land; and

The Colorado state forest service for locating wildfire hazard areas.

As the work of making the whole master plan progresses, the commission may from time to time adopt and publish a part thereof. Any such part shall cover one or more major sections or divisions of the municipality or one or more of the foregoing or other functional matters to be included in the plan. The commission may amend, extend, or add to the plan from time to time.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2007, p. 613, § 2, effective August 3, 2007.)

Each municipality that has a population of two thousand persons or more and that is wholly or partially located in a county that is subject to the requirements of section 30-28-106 (4), C.R.S., shall adopt a master plan within two years after January 8, 2002.

The department of local affairs shall annually determine, based on the population statistics maintained by said department, whether a municipality is subject to the requirements of this subsection (4), and shall notify any municipality that is newly identified as being subject to said requirements. Any such municipality shall have two years following receipt of notification from the department to adopt a master plan.

Once a municipality is identified as being subject to the requirements of this subsection (4), the municipality shall at all times thereafter remain subject to the requirements of this subsection (4), regardless of whether it continues to meet the criteria specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection (4).

A master plan adopted in accordance with the requirements of subsection (4) of this section shall contain a recreational and tourism uses element pursuant to which the municipality shall indicate how it intends to provide for the recreational and tourism needs of residents of the municipality and visitors to the municipality through delineated areas dedicated to, without limitation, hiking, mountain biking, rock climbing, skiing, cross country skiing, rafting, fishing, boating, hunting, and shooting, or any other form of sports or other recreational activity, as applicable, and commercial facilities supporting such uses.

The master plan of any municipality adopted or amended in accordance with the requirements of this section on and after August 8, 2005, shall satisfy the requirements of section 29-20-105.6, C.R.S., as applicable.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, no master plan originally adopted or amended in accordance with the requirements of this section shall conflict with a master plan for the extraction of commercial mineral deposits adopted by the municipality pursuant to section 34-1-304, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1147, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 79:

(1)(d) amended, p. 1162, § 10, effective January 1, 1980.

L. 97:

(3) added, p. 414, § 2, effective April 24.

L. 2000:

(1) amended, p. 874, § 2, effective August 2.

L. 2001, 2nd Ex. Sess.:

(4) and (5) added, p. 22, § 2, effective January 8, 2002.

L. 2002:

(5) amended, p. 1036, § 84, effective June 1.

L. 2005:

(6) added, p. 223, § 3, effective August 8.

L. 2007:

IP(1) and (3) amended and (7) added, p. 613, § 2, effective August 3.

L. 2010:

(1)(b) and (6) amended, (HB 10-1205), ch. 242, p. 1078, § 3, effective August 11.

L. 2012:

IP(1) and (1)(k)(II) amended, (HB 12-1317), ch. 248, p. 1206, § 13, effective June 4.

L. 2020:

IP(1) and (1)(d) amended, (HB 20-1095), ch. 82, p. 332, § 2, effective September 14.

L. 2022:

(1)(f) amended, (SB 22-118), ch. 335, p. 2373, § 9, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-23-106 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-23-207. Purposes in view.

In the preparation of such plan, the commission shall make careful and comprehensive surveys and studies of present conditions and future growth of the municipality, with due regard to its relation to neighboring territory. The plan shall be made with the general purpose of guiding and accomplishing a coordinated, adjusted, and harmonious development of the municipality and its environs which will, in accordance with present and future needs, best promote health, safety, order, convenience, prosperity, and general welfare, as well as efficiency and economy in the process of development, including, among other things, adequate provision for traffic, the promotion of safety from fire, flood waters, and other dangers, adequate provision for light and air, distribution of population, affordable housing, the promotion of good civic design and arrangement, efficient expenditure of public funds, the promotion of energy conservation, and the adequate provision of public utilities and other public requirements.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1147, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 79:

Entire section amended, p. 1163, § 11, effective January 1, 1980.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 414, § 3, effective April 24.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-23-107 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-23-208. Procedure of commission.

The commission may adopt the plan as a whole by a single resolution or may by successive resolutions adopt successive parts of the plan (said parts corresponding with major geographical sections or divisions of the municipality or with functional subdivisions of the subject matter of the plan) and may adopt any amendment or extension thereof or addition thereto. Before the adoption of the plan or any such part, amendment, extension, or addition, the commission shall hold at least one public hearing thereon, notice of the time and place of which shall be given by one publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the municipality and in the official newspaper of the county affected. The adoption of the plan, any part, amendment, extension, or addition shall be by resolution of the commission carried by the affirmative votes of not less than two-thirds of the entire membership of the commission. The resolution shall refer expressly to the maps and descriptive and other matter intended by the commission to form the whole or part of the plan, and the action taken shall be recorded on the map and plan and descriptive matter by the identifying signature of the chairman or secretary of the commission. An attested copy of the plan or part thereof shall be certified to each governmental body of the territory affected and, after the approval by each body, shall be filed with the county clerk and recorder of each county wherein the territory is located.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1148, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-23-108 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-23-209. Legal status of official plan.

When the commission has adopted the master plan of the municipality or of one or more major sections or districts thereof, no street, square, park or other public way, ground or open space, public building or structure, or publicly or privately owned public utility shall be constructed or authorized in the municipality or in such planned section and district until the location, character, and extent thereof has been submitted for approval by the commission. In case of disapproval, the commission shall communicate its reasons to the municipality's governing body, which has the power to overrule such disapproval by a recorded vote of not less than two-thirds of its entire membership. If the public way, ground space, building, structure, or utility is one the authorization or financing of which does not, under the law or charter provisions governing the same, fall within the province of the municipal governing body, the submission to the commission shall be by the governmental body having jurisdiction, and the planning commission's disapproval may be overruled by said governmental body by a vote of not less than two-thirds of its membership. The failure of the commission to act within sixty days from and after the date of official submission to it shall be deemed approval.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1148, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-23-109 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-23-210. Publicity - travel - information - entry.

The commission has power to promote public interest in and understanding of the plan and to that end may publish and distribute copies of the plan or any report and may employ such other means of publicity and education as it may determine. Members of the commission may attend city planning conferences, meetings of city planning institutes, or hearings upon pending municipal planning legislation, and the commission may pay, by resolution, the reasonable traveling expenses incident to such attendance. The commission shall recommend, from time to time, to the appropriate public officials programs for public structures and improvements and for the financing thereof. It shall be part of its duties to consult and advise with public officials and agencies, public utility companies, civic, educational, professional, and other organizations, and with citizens in relation to protecting and carrying out the plan. The commission has the right to accept and use gifts for the exercise of its functions. All public officials shall furnish to the commission, upon request, within a reasonable length of time, such available information as the commission may require for its work. The commission and its members, officers, and employees, in the performance of their functions, may enter upon any land and make examinations and surveys and place and maintain necessary marks and monuments thereon. In general, the commission has such powers as are necessary to enable it to fulfill its functions, to promote municipal planning, or to carry out the purposes of this part 2.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1148, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-23-110 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-23-211. Zoning.

Where a commission is established in accordance with the provisions of this part 2, it has and shall exercise all of the powers and rights granted to the zoning commission by part 3 of this article. When there is a zoning commission in existence at the time that a commission is created, the zoning commission shall deliver to the commission all of its records and shall thereafter cease to exercise the powers and prerogatives previously exercised by it; except that, if the existing zoning commission is nearing completion of a zoning plan, the governing body of the municipality may postpone, by resolution, the transfer of the zoning commission's powers until completion of the zoning plan; but in no event shall the period of such postponement exceed six months from the date of the creation of the commission. Nothing in this section shall invalidate or otherwise affect any zoning law or regulation or any action of the zoning commission adopted or taken prior to the creation of a commission.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1149, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-23-111 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-23-212. Jurisdiction.

The territorial jurisdiction of any commission over the subdivision of land includes all land located within the legal boundaries of the municipality and, limited only to control with reference to a major street plan and not otherwise, also includes all land lying within three miles of the boundaries of the municipality not located in any other municipality; except that in the case of any such land lying within five miles of more than one municipality, the jurisdiction of each commission shall terminate at a boundary line equidistant from the respective municipal limits of such municipalities. The jurisdiction over the subdivision of lands outside the boundary of a municipality shall apply equally to any municipality.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1149, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-23-112 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-23-213. Scope of control.

When a commission has adopted a major street plan for the territory within its subdivision control, or any part thereof, as provided in section 31-23-208, and has filed a certified copy of such plan in the office of the county clerk and recorder of the county in which such territory or such part is located, no plat of a subdivision of land within such territory or such part shall be filed or recorded until it has been approved by such commission and such approval entered in writing on the plat by the chairman or secretary of the commission.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1149, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-23-113 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-23-214. Subdivision regulations.

Before any commission exercises the powers set forth in section 31-23-213, it shall adopt regulations governing the subdivision of land within its jurisdiction and shall publish the same in pamphlet form, which shall be available for public distribution, or, at the election of the commission, the regulations may be published once each week for three consecutive weeks in the official paper of the municipality or county in which such subdivisions, or any part thereof, are located. Such regulations may provide for the proper arrangement of streets in relation to other existing or planned streets and to the master plan, for adequate and convenient open spaces for traffic, utilities, access of fire fighting apparatus, recreation, light, and air, and for the avoidance of congestion of population, including minimum area and width of lots. The regulations may also provide for waivers from subdivision requirements and may establish different requirements applicable to subdivisions of different sizes, densities, or types of dwelling units. In the territory subject to subdivision jurisdiction beyond the municipal limits, the regulations shall provide only for conformance with the major street plan.

(1.5) Subdivision regulations adopted under provisions of this section may protect and assure access to sunlight for solar energy devices by considering in subdivision development plans the use of restrictive covenants or solar easements, height restrictions, side yard and setback requirements, street orientation and width requirements, or other permissible forms of land use controls.

Before the adoption of the regulations referred to in this section, a public hearing shall be held thereon in the municipality. A copy of such regulations shall be certified by the commission to the county clerk and recorders of the counties in which the municipality and territory are located.

Subdivision regulations adopted under provisions of this section shall require that a subdivider, as defined in section 30-28-101 (9), C.R.S., submit to the commission evidence that provision has been made for facility sites, easements, and rights of access for electrical and natural gas utility service sufficient to ensure reliable and adequate electric or, if applicable, natural gas service for any proposed subdivision. Submission of a letter of agreement between the subdivider and utility serving the site shall be deemed sufficient to establish that adequate provision for electric or, if applicable, natural gas service to a proposed subdivision has been made.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1150, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 79:

(1.5) added, p. 1163, § 12, effective January 1, 1980.

L. 81:

(1) amended, p. 1512, § 2, effective June 4.

L. 83:

(2) amended, p. 1262, § 1, effective March 15.

L. 2000:

(3) added, p. 1618, § 2, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-23-114 as it existed prior to 1975.

Cross references:

For registration of subdivision developers, see part 5 of article 10 of title 12.

31-23-214.1. Subdivision plan or plat - access to public highways.

No person may submit an application for subdivision approval to a local authority unless the subdivision plan or plat provides, pursuant to section 43-2-147, C.R.S., that all lots and parcels created by the subdivision will have access to the state highway system in conformance with the state highway access code.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire section added, p. 796, § 59, effective June 5.

L. 82:

Entire section amended, p. 627, § 35, effective April 2.

31-23-215. Procedure - legal effect.

The commission shall approve or disapprove a plat within thirty days after said plat has been submitted to it; otherwise such plat shall be deemed approved and a certificate to that effect shall be issued by the commission on demand unless the applicant for the commission's approval waives this requirement and consents to an extension of such period. The ground of disapproval of any plat shall be stated upon the records of the commission. No plat shall be acted on by the commission without affording a hearing thereon. Notice of the time and place of such hearing shall be sent to mineral estate owners in accordance with article 65.5 of title 24, C.R.S.

Every plat approved by the commission, by virtue of such approval, shall be deemed to be an amendment or an addition to or a detail of the municipal plan and a part thereof. Approval of a plat shall not constitute or effect an acceptance by the public of any street or other open space shown upon the plat. From time to time, the commission may recommend to the governing body amendments of the zoning ordinance or map or additions thereto to conform to the commission's recommendations for the zoning regulations of the territory comprised within approved subdivisions. The commission has the power to impose use, height, area, or bulk requirements or restrictions governing buildings and premises within the subdivision if such requirements or restrictions do not authorize the violation of the then effective zoning ordinance of the municipality. Such requirements or restrictions shall be stated upon the plat prior to the approval and recording thereof, shall have the force of law, and shall be enforceable in the same manner and with the same sanctions and penalties and subject to the same powers of amendment or repeal as though set out as a part of the zoning ordinance or map of the municipality. No action taken under this section shall be binding for any purpose until such action has been approved by the governmental body of the territory affected or any part thereof.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1150, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 79:

(1) amended, p. 1167, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2001:

(1) amended, p. 490, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(1) amended, p. 2122, § 8, effective August 3.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-23-115 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-23-216. Penalties for sales in unapproved subdivisions.

Whoever, being the owner or agent of the owner of any land located within a subdivision, transfers or sells, agrees to sell, or negotiates to sell any land by reference to or exhibition of or by use of a plat of a subdivision before such plat has been approved by the commission and recorded or filed in the office of the appropriate county clerk and recorder shall pay a penalty of one hundred dollars to the municipality for each lot or parcel so transferred, or sold, or agreed or negotiated to be sold. The description of such lot or parcel by metes and bounds in the instrument of transfer or other document used in the process of selling or transferring shall not exempt the transaction from such penalties or from the remedies provided in this section. The municipality may enjoin such transfer or sale or agreement by action for injunction brought in any court of competent jurisdiction and may recover the penalty by civil action in any court of competent jurisdiction.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1151, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-23-116 as it existed prior to 1975.

Cross references:

For the requirements of monumentation of external boundaries of all subdivisions prior to recording of a plat, see § 38-51-105.

31-23-216.5. Additional enforcement - fine or imprisonment - abatement or removal.

In addition to any other remedies, the governing body of any municipality may provide by ordinance that it is unlawful to erect, construct, reconstruct, use, or alter any building or structure or to use any land in violation of any municipal subdivision regulation, and the governing body may enforce obedience to such ordinance by fine or imprisonment as provided in section 31-16-101.

In case any building or structure is or is proposed to be erected, constructed, reconstructed, altered, or used or any land is or is proposed to be used in violation of any municipal subdivision regulation, the municipality, in addition to other remedies provided by law, may institute an appropriate action to prevent, enjoin, abate, or remove the violation to prevent the occupancy of the building, structure, or land or to prevent any illegal act or use in or on such premises.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire section added, p. 1513, § 3, effective June 4.

31-23-217. Acceptance and improvement of streets.

The municipality shall not accept, lay out, open, improve, grade, pave, curb, or light any street or lay or authorize water mains or sewers or connections to be laid in any street within any portion of a territory for which the commission has adopted a major street plan unless such street:

Has been accepted or opened as or otherwise has received the legal status of a public street prior to the adoption of such plan; or

Corresponds with a street shown on the official master plan or with a street on a subdivision plat approved by the planning commission or with a street on a street plat made by and adopted by the commission. However, the governing body may accept any street not shown on or not corresponding with a street on the official master plan or on any approved subdivision plat or an approved street plat if the ordinance or other measure accepting such street is first submitted to the commission for its approval and, if approved by the commission, is enacted or passed by not less than a majority of the entire membership of the governing body or, if disapproved by the commission, is enacted or passed by not less than two-thirds of the entire membership of the governing body.

A street approved by the commission upon submission by the governing body or a street accepted by a two-thirds vote after disapproval by the commission shall have the status of an approved street as though it had been originally shown on the official master plan or on a subdivision plat approved by the commission or had been originally platted by the commission.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1151, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-23-117 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-23-218. Erection of buildings.

After the time when a commission has adopted a major street plan of the territory within the municipal limits of said municipality, no building shall be erected on any lot within such territory or part nor shall a building permit be issued therefor unless the street giving access to the lot upon which such building is proposed to be placed:

Has been accepted or opened as or otherwise has received the legal status of a public street prior to that time; or

Corresponds with a street shown on the official master plan, with a street or subdivision plat approved by the planning commission, with a street on a street plat made by and adopted by the commission, or with a street accepted by the governing body in accordance with the provisions of section 31-23-217. Any building erected in violation of this section is an unlawful structure, and the building inspector or other appropriate official may cause it to be vacated or have it removed.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1151, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-23-118 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-23-219. Status of existing statutes.

After the time when a municipal planning commission has control over subdivisions as provided in section 31-23-213, the jurisdiction of the planning commission over plats shall be exclusive within the territory under its jurisdiction, and all statutory control over plats or subdivisions of land granted by other statutes, insofar as in harmony with the provisions of this part 2, shall be deemed transferred to the planning commission of such municipality.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1152, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-23-119 as it existed prior to 1975.